Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Registration of Guests

§ 3101.
Registration records.

Each keeper of a hotel, inn, lodging house, or roadside camp or cabin shall keep or cause to be kept a record in which shall be recorded the true name and residence of each person engaging or occupying a private room containing a bed or couch or opening into a room containing a bed or couch for any period of the day or night, in any part of the premises controlled by the owner, manager, or lessee.
Each keeper shall preserve such registration record for three years.

§ 3102.
False registration; failure to register.

A person shall not write, or cause to be written, or if in charge of the registration record, knowingly permit to be written, in any such registration record of any hotel, inn, lodging house, or roadside camp or cabin any other or different name or designation than the true name in ordinary use of the person registering or causing himself or herself to be registered therein.
Nor shall any person occupying such room fail to register or fail to cause himself or herself to be so registered.

§ 3103.
Penalties.

A person who violates a provision of sections 3101 and 3102 of this title shall be fined not more than $25.00.